Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-154.03
Employable recipient; community service; participation; how construed.

Participation in a county-approved community service program shall not be construed as employment for purposes of Chapter 48. No employable recipient participating in such a community service program shall be deemed an employee of the county for purposes of the County Employees Retirement Act or for any other purpose.

Laws 1991, LB 227, § 7.

County Employees Retirement Act, see section 23-2331.